Washington statutes.
RCW 43.72.914

Reservation of legislative power—1993 c 492.

The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal all or any part of this act at any time and there shall be no vested private right of any kind against such amendment or repeal. All the rights, privileges, or immunities conferred by this act or any acts done pursuant thereto shall exist subject to the power of the legislature to amend or repeal this act at any time.

[ 1993 c 492 s 494.]